Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2523
Applicant for licensure; reciprocity; continuing competency requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) An applicant for licensure to practice as an occupational therapist or to practice as an occupational therapy assistant who has met the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 for a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction but is not practicing at the time of application for licensure shall present proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the three years immediately preceding the application for licensure completed continuing competency requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 863;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 83.